Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.200

Methamphetamine manufacture—Presence of child.

A law enforcement agency in the course of investigating: (1) An allegation under RCW 69.50.401 (1) and (2) (a) through (e) relating to manufacture of methamphetamine; or (2) an allegation under RCW 69.50.440 relating to possession of ephedrine or any of its salts or isomers or salts of isomers, pseudoephedrine or any of its salts or isomers or salts of isomers, pressurized ammonia gas, or pressurized ammonia gas solution with intent to manufacture methamphetamine, that discovers a child present at the site, shall contact the department immediately.

[ 2009 c 520 s 18; 2002 c 134 s 4; 2001 c 52 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 134: See note following RCW 69.50.440.

Finding—Construction—2001 c 52: See notes following RCW 13.34.350.